Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 4

Officers and Employees

6-35-401. City clerk.

The city manager shall appoint a city clerk, together with such deputy city clerks as may be authorized by ordinance. The city clerk shall be responsible for keeping and preserving the city seal and all records of the council, attending meetings of the council and keeping a journal of proceedings at such meetings, preparing and certifying copies of official records in the city clerk's office, for which fees may be prescribed by ordinance, and performing all other duties as are prescribed by the council or city manager.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 7.08; T.C.A., § 6-3507.

Law Reviews.

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).

6-35-402. Appointment, removal and supervision of personnel.

The manager has the power to appoint, promote, suspend, transfer, and remove, or to take any other established personnel action consistent with §§ 6-35-403 — 6-35-411 with regard to all administrative officers and employees of the city responsible to the manager; or the manager may, at the manager's discretion, authorize the head of a department or office responsible to the manager to take such actions regarding subordinates in such department or office. The manager shall appoint such heads of administrative offices, organization units, and activities as the manager may deem necessary. The manager may combine, or personally hold, any such administrative offices established pursuant to this section or otherwise established, or may delegate parts of the duties of the manager's office to designated subordinates.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 7.05; T.C.A., § 6-3523.

6-35-403. Merit system.

The policy of the city shall be to employ those persons best qualified to carry out the functions of the city. To this end, the council shall, by ordinance, establish a merit system providing for the appointment and promotion of city officers and employees solely on the basis of competence and fitness.

All officers and employees shall be included in such merit system, except:

Council members;

Members of boards who are not city employees;

The manager and the manager's secretary;

Department heads; and

Organizations and their employees and other persons who are engaged by the city on a contractual basis.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 7.24; T.C.A., § 6-3524.

6-35-404. Manager to administer personnel system.

The manager shall be responsible for the administration of the merit system. The manager shall:

With the advice of the personnel advisory board, develop, maintain, and apply suitable provisions for the classification of positions and for the recruitment, compensation, training, promotions and disciplinary and related aspects of personnel management; and

Develop and revise, as necessary, a comprehensive pay plan and personnel rules setting forth employment conditions.

The personnel advisory board shall review such plans and rules and proposed revisions thereof, and submit them to the council with recommendations for adoption.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 7.25; T.C.A., § 6-3525.

6-35-405. Investigation of complaints by personnel advisory board.

The personnel advisory board shall investigate complaints made to it in writing by any officer or employee who is included in the merit system and who is suspended or removed from such officer's or employee's position or otherwise adversely affected by a personnel action.

If, in the opinion of the board, the procedures established for such personnel action were not complied with, the board shall make decisions that shall be binding on the administrative officer of the city.

In all other cases, the board shall report its findings and recommendations, which shall be advisory in nature, in writing to the manager, and the decision of the manager shall be final. In all such cases any such officer or employee shall have the right to common law certiorari to review the action of the board and the manager.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 7.26; T.C.A., § 6-3526.

Cross-References. Advisory boards, § 6-33-105.

6-35-406. Personnel advisory board to assist manager.

The personnel advisory board shall assist the manager in other personnel matters as may be set forth by ordinance and may investigate and make recommendations and reports to the council and manager on improvements in conditions of municipal employment and on significant violations of the principles of sound personnel administration.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 7.27; T.C.A., § 6-3527.

Cross-References. Advisory boards, § 6-33-105.

6-35-407. Compensation.

Except as otherwise provided in this charter, the compensation of all officers and employees of the city shall be fixed by the manager within the limits of budget appropriations and in accordance with a comprehensive pay plan adopted by the council.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 7.28; T.C.A., § 6-3528.

6-35-408. Disposition of fees and commissions.

The compensation of officers and employees as fixed or otherwise provided for by this charter shall be in full payment for all official services of such officers or employees, and shall be in lieu of any and all fees, commissions, and other compensation that may be receivable by such officers in performance of the duties of their offices. Such fees, commissions and compensation shall belong to the city, be collected and accounted for by such officers, and be paid over to the city.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 7.29; T.C.A., § 6-3529.

6-35-409. Employee benefits.

The council may provide for the retirement of the city's nonelective officers and employees and make available to them any group, life, hospital, health, or accident insurance, either independently of, or as a supplement to, any retirement or other employee welfare benefits otherwise provided by law.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 7.30; T.C.A., § 6-3530.

6-35-410. Resignations.

The council shall prescribe by ordinance appropriate procedures with respect to resignations of officers and employees and with respect to the orderly transfer of records, assets, and other effects in the custody of such officers and employees to their successors or supervisors.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 7.31; T.C.A., § 6-3531.

6-35-411. Surety bonds.

All city officers or employees receiving, disbursing or responsible for city funds shall be bonded. The council may require any officer or employee to give a bond, approved by and in such amount as the council shall determine. All such bonds shall be corporate surety bonds, and the premiums thereon shall be paid by the city. No such bond shall be issued for a term exceeding four (4) years. No bond required by this section shall be renewed upon its expiration or in the event of the reappointment of any officer or employee to a position for which a bond is required, but a new bond shall be furnished. The resignation, removal, or discharge of any officer or employee of the city shall not, nor shall the election or appointment of another to such officer's or employee's office or employment, exonerate such officer or employee or such officer's or employee's sureties from liability incurred by such officers or employees, or such officer's or employee's sureties.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 7.32; T.C.A., § 6-3532.

6-35-412. Pecuniary interest prohibited.

No officer or employee of the city shall have any financial interest other than the common public interest in the profits of any contract, service, or other work performed for the city; or personally profit directly or indirectly from any contract, purchase, sale, or service between the city and any person or company; or personally as an agent provide any surety, bail, or bond required by law or subject to approval by the council.

No officer or any employee shall accept any free or preferred services, benefits or concessions from any person or company, except that free transportation may be provided for police officers and firefighters on official duty.

Any officer or employee who violates this section commits misconduct of office.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 7.33; T.C.A., § 6-3533.

Cross-References. Misconduct involving public officials and employees, title 39, ch. 16, part 4.

6-35-413. Political activity prohibited — Penalty.

No officer or employee of the city, other than council members, or members of the board of education, shall continue in the employment of the city after becoming a candidate for nomination or election to any public office nor hold office in any political activity.

No officer or employee of the city shall orally, by letter or otherwise, solicit or be in any manner concerned in soliciting any assessment, subscription or contribution for any political party or political purpose from any officer or employee of the city.

No officer or employee of the city, other than council members or board of education members, shall make any contribution to the campaign funds of any candidate in any city election, nor shall such person take part in the management, affairs or political campaign of any city election, other than in the exercise of such person's rights as a citizen to express such person's opinions and to cast such person's vote.

Any person who alone or with others willfully or corruptly violates any provision of this section commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Any person who is convicted under this section shall be ineligible to hold any office or position of employment in the city government for a period of five (5) years thereafter and, if such person is an officer or employee at the time of conviction, shall immediately forfeit and vacate the office or position held.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 7.34; T.C.A., § 6-3534; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Attorney General Opinions. Employee of city electric system may not run for city council, OAG 96-106, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 116 (8/20/96).